West Virginia, session 2025, SB188.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Crimes against the person. §61-2-4. Voluntary manslaughter; penalty. Voluntary manslaughter shall be punished by a definite term of imprisonment in the penitentiary which is not less than three five nor more than fifteen 25 years. A person imprisoned pursuant to the provisions of this section is not eligible for parole prior to having served a minimum of three five years of his or her sentence or the minimum period required by the provisions of §62-12-13, whichever is greater.